Utah statutes.
17B-1-307.   Annual compensation -- Per diem compensation -- Participation
in group insurance plan -- Reimbursement of expenses.
(1) (a) Except as provided in Subsection 17B-1-308(1)(e), a member of a board
of trustees may receive compensation for service on the board, as determined
by the board of trustees.
(b)  The amount of compensation under this Subsection (1) may not exceed
$5,000 per year.
(c) (i)  As determined by the board of trustees, a member of the board of
trustees may participate in a group insurance plan provided to employees of
the local district on the same basis as employees of the local district.
(ii)  The amount that the local district pays to provide a member with
coverage under a group insurance plan shall be included as part of the
member's compensation for purposes of Subsection (1)(b).
(2) (a)  As determined by the board of trustees, a member of a board of
trustees may receive per diem compensation, in addition to the compensation
provided in Subsection (1), for attendance at up to 12 meetings or activities
per year related to any district business.
(b)  The amount of per diem compensation under Subsection (2)(a) shall be as
established by the Division of Finance for policy boards, advisory boards,
councils, or committees within state government.
(3)  In addition to any compensation a member receives under this section,
each member of a board of trustees shall be reimbursed by the local district
for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending board meetings and
in performing the member's official duties.
